Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6116SV (1) 91 jm/ns S.F. 2451 Section 1. Section 123.46A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. Licensees authorized to sell alcoholic liquor, wine, 3 or beer in original unopened containers for consumption off 4 the licensed premises may deliver alcoholic liquor, wine, 5 or beer to a home , another licensed premises if there is 6 identical ownership of the premises by the licensee, or 7 other designated location in this state. Deliveries shall be 8 limited to alcoholic beverages authorized by the licenseeâs 9 license. Orders delivered to another licensed premises shall 10 contain only those alcoholic beverages authorized for sale 11 by the retail alcohol license covering the premises to which 12 the alcoholic beverages will be delivered. Orders delivered 13 to another licensed premises shall be fulfilled using the 14 alcoholic beverages inventory owned by the licensee who will 15 receive the order for delivery. If the recipient refuses or 16 fails to pick up the delivery, or is ineligible to receive the 17 delivery, the alcoholic beverages shall be returned to the 18 licensee who fulfilled the order. 19 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 123.46B Transfers of alcoholic liquor 20 by retailers. 21 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter 22 to the contrary, a licensee authorized to sell alcoholic 23 liquor in original unopened containers for consumption off 24 the licensed premises may transfer alcoholic liquor between 25 licensed premises with identical ownership as the transferring 26 licensee, and the transfer shall not be considered a delivery 27 under section 123.46A. 28 2. A transfer pursuant to subsection 1 shall be considered 29 inventory owned by the licensee transferring the alcoholic 30 liquor until placement on the premises of the licensee 31 receiving the alcoholic liquor, at which point the alcoholic 32 liquor shall be considered inventory owned by the licensee 33 receiving the alcoholic liquor for regulatory and enforcement 34 purposes under this chapter. 35 -1- LSB 6116SV (1) 91 jm/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 2451 3. A licensee conducting a transfer under this section 1 shall maintain records indicating the date of the transfer, 2 the quantity and type of alcoholic liquor transferred, and the 3 licensee receiving the transfer. Records shall be maintained 4 for three years from the date of the transfer and shall be made 5 accessible and open to inspection pursuant to section 123.30, 6 subsection 1, during normal business hours of the licensee. 7